California statutes. Vehicle Code
(c) Sponsor research into effective communication techniques to reach all highway users on matters of motorcyclist safety.

(d) Establish an advisory committee of persons from other state and local agencies with an interest in motorcycle safety; persons from the motorcycle industry; motorcycle safety organizations; motorcycle enthusiast organizations; and others with an interest in motorcycle safety, to assist in the establishment of a comprehensive program of motorcycle safety.

(e) Adopt standards for course content, contact hours, curriculum, instructor training and testing, and instructional quality control, and setting forth a maximum amount for course fees for the novice rider training course specified in subdivisions (g) and (i) of Section 12804.9.

(f) (1) Adopt standards for course content, contact hours, curriculum, instructor training and testing, and instructional quality control, for a premier motorcyclist safety training program. Motorcycle safety training courses offered under a premier motorcyclist safety training program shall meet all of the following requirements:

(A) Provide a core curriculum approved for the novice rider training course specified in subdivision (e).

(B) Additional course requirements established by the commissioner.

(2) On and after January 1, 2008, the commissioner shall not impose a maximum amount for course fees for courses provided under the premier motorcyclist safety training program.

(3) All administrative costs of a premier motorcyclist safety training program shall be paid for by the provider, and none of the costs shall be paid for by the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 711, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2933.

The commissioner shall not directly manage or provide program services. Any program service financed under this article shall be provided under contractual arrangements or grant funding. All public agencies assisting or providing program services under this article shall be fully reimbursed for their costs by the commissioner. The commissioner shall monitor and evaluate any contracts or grants executed pursuant to this article to ensure that the provisions of the contracts or grants are adhered to by the recipients.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 547, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2934.

(a) The California Motorcyclist Safety Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. The money in the fund is available, when appropriated by the Legislature, to fund programs established pursuant to this article and to defray related costs incurred. Moneys in the fund are and shall be held as trust funds for the exclusive trust purposes specified in this article.

(b) The commissioner shall not in any way encumber moneys in the fund beyond that amount which is actually available in the fund at the time of encumbrance, and shall not in any manner pledge or encumber future revenues to accrue to the fund from any source.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 547, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2935.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall, in addition to other fees, collect a fee of two dollars ($2) upon initial registration and renewal of registration of every motorcycle subject to registration fees. These additional fees shall be deposited in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 547, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. New Motor Vehicle Board [3000. - 3085.10.]



  ARTICLE 1. Organization of Board [3000. - 3016.]

3000.

There is in the Department of Motor Vehicles a New Motor Vehicle Board, which consists of nine members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------

3001.

(a) Four of the appointive members of the board shall be new motor vehicle dealers as defined in Section 426 who have engaged for a period of not less than five years preceding their appointment in activities regulated by Article 1 (commencing with Section 11700) of Chapter 4 of Division 5. These members shall be appointed by the Governor.

(b) Each of the five remaining appointive members shall be a public member who is not a licentiate under Article 1 (commencing with Section 11700) or 2 (commencing with Section 11800) of Chapter 4 of Division 5 or an employee of such licentiate at the time of appointment and one of these five appointive members shall have been admitted to practice law in the state for at least 10 years
 immediately preceding his or her appointment. One public member shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, one by the Speaker of the Assembly, and three by the Governor.

(c) Each member shall be of good moral character.

(d) This section does not apply to a dealer who deals exclusively in motorcycles, all-terrain vehicles, as defined in Section 111, or recreational vehicles, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 279, Sec. 2.   (AB 988)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3002.

The appointments of the appointive members shall be made effective as of the effective date of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1397.)
-------------------------------------------

3003.

(a) Each appointive member of the board shall be appointed for a term of four years and shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of his or her successor or until one year has elapsed since the expiration of the time for which he or she was appointed, whichever occurs first.

(b) The terms of the members of the board first appointed shall expire as follows: one public member and one new motor vehicle dealer member, January 15, 1969; two public members and one new motor vehicle dealer member, January 15, 1970; two public members and two new motor vehicle dealer members, January 15, 1971. The terms shall thereupon expire in the same relative order.

(c) Vacancies occurring shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

This section does not apply to a dealer who deals exclusively in motorcycles, all-terrain vehicles, as defined in Section 111, or recreational vehicles, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 279, Sec. 3.   (AB 988)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3004.

Members of the board shall take an oath of office as provided in the Constitution and the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1397.)
-------------------------------------------

3005.

The appointing authority has the power to remove from office at any time, any member of the board appointed by such appointing authority for continued neglect of duties required by law, or for incompetence, or unprofessional or dishonorable conduct. Nothing in this section shall be construed as a limitation or restriction on the power of the appointing authority, conferred by any other provision of law, to remove any member of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1397.)
-------------------------------------------

3006.

The board shall organize and elect a president from among its members for a term of one year at the first meeting of each year. The newly elected president shall assume his or her duties at the conclusion of the meeting at which he or she was elected. Reelection to office during membership is unrestricted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 512, Sec. 2.   (SB 155)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3007.

The board shall meet at least twice during each calendar year.

Special meetings may be called at any time by the president or by any five members of the board upon notice for such time and in such manner as the board may provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1397.)
-------------------------------------------

3008.

All meetings of the board shall be open and public, and all persons shall be permitted to attend any meeting of the board, except that the board may hold executive sessions to deliberate on the decision to be reached upon the evidence introduced in a proceeding conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 6.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.

Five members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, for the performance of any duty or the exercise of any power or authority of the board, except that three members of the board, who are not new motor vehicle dealers, shall constitute a quorum for the purposes of Article 4 (commencing with Section 3060) and the consideration of a petition pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3050 that involves a dispute between a franchisee and franchisor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 2.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3011.

A vacancy on the board shall not impair the power of the remaining members to perform all duties and exercise all powers of the board, providing the members remaining constitute a quorum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1397.)
-------------------------------------------

3012.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day actually spent in the discharge of official duties, and he or she shall be reimbursed for traveling and other expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of his or her duties. The per diem and reimbursement shall be wholly defrayed from funds that shall be provided in the annual budget of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 512, Sec. 4.   (SB 155)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3013.

The board shall adopt a seal and such other device as the members may desire thereon, by which they shall authenticate all papers and documents under their control.

Copies of all records and papers in the board’s office shall be received in evidence in all cases when certified under the hand and seal of the board, equally and with like effect as the originals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1397.)
-------------------------------------------

3014.

The board may appoint an executive director, who shall be exempt from civil service requirements, and who shall devote as much time as may be necessary to discharge the functions of the board as herein provided. The department shall provide the board with the necessary personnel, office space, equipment, supplies, and services that, in the opinion of the board, may be necessary to administer this chapter. However, the board may contract with the department or another state agency for office space, equipment, supplies, and services, as determined by the board to be appropriate, for the administration of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 451, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3015.

In addition to the office of the executive director in Sacramento, the department shall, as the need therefor occurs, secure adequate rooms for the meetings of the board in Los Angeles, San Francisco, Sacramento, or other locations in the state as may be required in the discretion of the board, to administer this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 451, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3016.

(a) New motor vehicle dealers and other licensees under the jurisdiction of the board shall be charged fees sufficient to fully fund the activities of the board other than those conducted pursuant to Section 472.5 of the Business and Professions Code. The board may recover the direct cost of the activities required by Section 472.5 of the Business and Professions Code by charging the Department of Consumer Affairs a fee which shall be paid by the Department of Consumer Affairs with funds appropriated from the Certification Account in the Consumer Affairs Fund. All fees shall be deposited, and held separate from other moneys, in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund, and shall not be transferred to the State Highway Account pursuant to Section 42273.

(b) The fees shall be available, when appropriated, exclusively to fund the activities of the board. If, at the conclusion of any fiscal year, the amount of fees collected exceeds the amount of expenditures for this purpose during the fiscal year, the surplus shall be carried over into the succeeding fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 143.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties of Board [3050. - 3051.]

3050.

The board shall do all of the following:

(a) Adopt rules and regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code governing those matters that are specifically committed to its jurisdiction.

(b) Consider any matter concerning the activities or practices of any person applying for or holding a license as a new motor vehicle dealer, manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or representative pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5 submitted by any person. A member of the board who is a new motor vehicle dealer may not participate in, hear, comment, advise other members upon, or decide any matter considered by the board pursuant to this subdivision that involves a dispute between a franchisee and franchisor. After that consideration, the board may do any one or any combination of the following:

(1) Direct the department to conduct investigation of matters that the board deems reasonable, and make a written report
 on the results of the investigation to the board within the time specified by the board.

(2) (A) Undertake to mediate, arbitrate, or otherwise resolve any honest difference of opinion or viewpoint existing between any member of the public and any new motor vehicle dealer, manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or representative.

(B) The board does not have jurisdiction over a dispute pursuant to this paragraph involving any member of the public, including a consumer or other person who is not applying for or holding a license as a new motor vehicle dealer, manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or representative
 pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5, unless that person has filed the dispute with the board or consents to jurisdiction by the board.

(3) Order the department to exercise any and all authority or power that the department may have with respect to the issuance, renewal, refusal to renew, suspension, or revocation of the license of any new motor vehicle dealer, manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or representative as that license is required under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5.

(c) Hear and
 decide, within the limitations and in accordance with the procedure provided, a protest presented by a franchisee pursuant to Section 3060, 3062, 3064, 3065, 3065.1, 3065.3, 3065.4, 3070, 3072, 3074, 3075, or 3076. A member of the board who is a new motor vehicle dealer may not participate in, hear, comment, advise other members upon, or decide, any matter involving a protest filed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 3060), unless all parties to the protest stipulate otherwise.

(d) Hear and decide, within the limitations and in accordance with the procedure provided, a protest presented by an association challenging a policy of a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch pursuant to Section 3085. A member of the board
 who is a new motor vehicle dealer may not participate in, hear, comment, advise other members upon, or decide, any matter involving a protest filed pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 3085), unless all participants to the protest stipulate otherwise.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), the courts have jurisdiction over all common law and statutory claims originally cognizable in the courts. For those claims, a party may initiate an action directly in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 3.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.       Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2019, Ch. 796.)
-------------------------------------------

3050.

The board shall do all of the following:

(a) Adopt rules and regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code governing those matters that are specifically committed to its jurisdiction.

(b) Consider any matter concerning the activities or practices of any person applying for or holding a license as a new motor vehicle dealer, manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or representative pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5 submitted by any person. A member of the
 board who is a new motor vehicle dealer may not participate in, hear, comment, advise other members upon, or decide, any matter considered by the board pursuant to this subdivision that involves a dispute between a franchisee and franchisor. After that consideration, the board may do any one or any combination of the following:

(1) Direct the department to conduct investigation of matters that the board deems reasonable, and make a written report on the results of the investigation to the board within the time specified by the board.

(2) (A)   Undertake to mediate, arbitrate, or otherwise resolve any honest difference of opinion or viewpoint existing between any member of the public and any new motor vehicle dealer, manufacturer,
 manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or representative.

(B) The board does not have jurisdiction over a dispute pursuant to this paragraph involving any member of the public, including a consumer, or other person that is not applying for or holding a license as a new motor vehicle dealer, manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or representative pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5, unless that person has filed the dispute with the board or consents to jurisdiction by the board.

(3) Order the department to exercise any and all authority or power that the department may have with respect to the issuance, renewal, refusal to renew, suspension, or revocation of the license of any new motor vehicle dealer, manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or representative as that license is required under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5.

(c) Hear and decide, within the limitations and in accordance with the procedure provided, a protest presented by a franchisee pursuant to Section 3060, 3062, 3064, 3065, 3065.1, 3065.3, 3065.4, 3070, 3072, 3074, 3075, or 3076. A member of the board who is a new motor vehicle
 dealer may not participate in, hear, comment, advise other members upon, or decide, any matter involving a protest filed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 3060), unless all parties to the protest stipulate otherwise.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), the courts have jurisdiction over all common law and statutory claims originally cognizable in the courts. For those claims, a party may initiate an action directly in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2030.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 4.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3050.1.

(a) In a proceeding, hearing, or in the discharge of duties imposed under this chapter, the board, its executive director, or an administrative law judge designated by the board may administer oaths, take depositions, certify to official acts, and issue subpoenas to compel attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, papers, and other documents in any part of the state.

(b) For purposes of discovery, the board or its executive director may, if deemed appropriate and proper under the circumstances, authorize the parties to engage in the civil action discovery procedures in Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure, excepting the provisions of Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 2030.010) of that title.
 Discovery shall be completed no later than 15 days prior to the commencement of the proceeding or hearing before the board. This subdivision shall apply only to those proceedings or hearings involving a petition filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3050 or protest filed pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 3050. The board, its executive director, or an administrative law judge designated by the board may issue subpoenas to compel attendance at depositions of persons having knowledge of the acts, omissions, or events that are the basis for the proceedings, as well as the production of books, records, papers, and other documents.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 5.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 6 of Stats. 2019, Ch. 796.)
-------------------------------------------

3050.1.

(a) In a proceeding, hearing, or in the discharge of duties imposed under this chapter, the board, its executive director, or an administrative law judge designated by the board may administer oaths, take depositions, certify to official acts, and issue subpoenas to compel attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, papers, and other documents in any part of the state.

(b) For purposes of discovery, the board or its executive director may, if deemed appropriate and proper under the circumstances, authorize the parties to engage in the civil action discovery procedures in Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4
 of the Code of Civil Procedure, excepting the provisions of Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 2030.010) of that title. Discovery shall be completed no later than 15 days prior to the commencement of the proceeding or hearing before the board. This subdivision shall apply only to those proceedings or hearings involving a petition filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3050 or protest filed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 3050. The board, its executive director, or an administrative law judge designated by the board may issue subpoenas to compel attendance at depositions of persons having knowledge of the acts, omissions, or events that are the basis for the proceedings, as well as the production of books, records,
 papers, and other documents.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2030.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 6.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3050.2.

(a) Obedience to subpoenas issued to compel attendance of witnesses, or the production of books, records, papers, and other documents at the proceeding or hearing, may be enforced by application to the superior court as set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Compliance with discovery procedures authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3050.1 may be enforced by application to the executive director of the board. The executive director may, at the direction of the board, upon a showing of failure to comply with authorized discovery without substantial justification for that failure, dismiss the protest or petition or suspend the proceedings pending compliance. The executive director may, at the direction of the board, upon a failure to comply with authorized discovery without substantial justification for that failure, require payment of costs incurred by the board, as well as attorney’s fees and costs of the party who successfully makes or opposes a motion to compel enforcement of discovery. Nothing in this section precludes the executive director from making application to the superior court to enforce obedience to subpoenas or compliance with other discovery procedures authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3050.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 451, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3050.3.

A witness, other than an officer or employee of the state or of a political subdivision of the state, who appears by order of the board or its executive director, shall receive for his or her attendance the same fees and the same mileage allowed by law to witnesses in civil cases. The amount shall be paid by the party at whose request the witness is subpoenaed. The mileage and fees, if any, of a witness subpoenaed by the board or its executive director, but not at the request of a party, shall be paid from the funds provided for the use of the board in the same manner that other expenses of the board are paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 451, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3050.4.

In a protest or petition before the board, the board, its executive director, or an administrative law judge designated by the board or its executive director, may order a mandatory settlement conference. The failure of a party to appear, to be prepared, or to have authority to settle the matter may result in one or more of the following:

(a) The board, its executive director, or an administrative law judge designated by the board or its executive director, may suspend all proceedings before the board in the matter until compliance.

(b) The board, its executive director, or an administrative law judge designated by the board or its executive director, may dismiss the proceedings or any part thereof before the board with or without prejudice.

(c) The board, its executive director, or an administrative law judge designated by the board or its executive director, may require all the board’s costs to be paid by the party at fault.

(d) The board, its executive director, or an administrative law judge designated by the board or its executive director, may deem that the party at fault has abandoned the matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 451, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3050.5.

Pursuant to Section 3016, the board shall establish a fee for the initial filing by any party in regard to any protest or petition filed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 7.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3050.6.

The board or its executive director may, in the event of a granting of a continuance of a scheduled matter, assess costs of the board upon the party receiving the continuance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 451, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3050.7.

(a) The board may adopt stipulated decisions and orders, without a hearing pursuant to Section 3066, 3080, or 3085.2, to resolve one or more issues raised by a protest or petition filed with the board. Whenever the parties to a protest or petition submit a proposed stipulated decision and order of the board, a copy of the proposed stipulated decision and order shall be transmitted by the executive director of the board to each member of the board. The proposed stipulated decision and order shall be deemed to be adopted by the board unless a member of the board notifies the executive director of the board of an objection
 thereto within 10 days after that board member has received a copy of the proposed stipulated decision and order.

(b) If the board adopts a stipulated decision and order to resolve a protest filed pursuant to Section 3060 or 3070 in which the parties stipulate that good cause exists for the termination of the franchise of the protestant, and the order provides for a conditional or unconditional termination of the franchise of the protestant, paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 3060 and paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 3070, which require a hearing to determine whether good cause exists for termination of the franchise, is inapplicable to the proceedings. If the stipulated decision and order provides for an unconditional termination of the franchise, the franchise may be terminated without further proceedings by the board. If the stipulated decision and order provides for the termination of the franchise, conditioned upon the
 failure of a party to comply with specified conditions, the franchise may be terminated upon a determination, according to the terms of the stipulated decision and order, that the conditions have not been met. If the stipulated decision and order provides for the termination of the franchise conditioned upon the occurrence of specified conditions, the franchise may be terminated upon a determination, according to the terms of the stipulated decision and order, that the stipulated conditions have occurred.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of
 that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 8.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 9 of Stats. 2019, Ch. 796.)
-------------------------------------------

3050.7.

(a) The board may adopt stipulated decisions and orders, without a hearing pursuant to Section 3066 or 3080, to resolve one or more issues raised by a protest or petition filed with the board. Whenever the parties to a protest or petition submit a proposed stipulated decision and order of the board, a copy of the proposed stipulated decision and order shall be transmitted by the executive director of the board to each member of the board. The proposed stipulated decision and order shall be deemed to be adopted by the board unless a member of the board notifies the executive director of the board of an objection thereto within 10 days after that board member has received a copy of the proposed stipulated decision and order.

(b) If the board adopts a stipulated decision and order to resolve a protest filed pursuant to Section 3060 or 3070 in which the parties stipulate that good cause exists for the termination of the franchise of the protestant, and the order provides for a conditional or unconditional termination of the franchise of the protestant, paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 3060 and paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 3070, which require a hearing to determine whether good cause exists for termination of the franchise, is inapplicable to the proceedings. If the stipulated decision and order provides for an unconditional termination of the franchise, the franchise may be terminated without further proceedings by the board. If the stipulated decision and order provides for the termination of the franchise, conditioned upon the failure
 of a party to comply with specified conditions, the franchise may be terminated upon a determination, according to the terms of the stipulated decision and order, that the conditions have not been met. If the stipulated decision and order provides for the termination of the franchise conditioned upon the occurrence of specified conditions, the franchise may be terminated upon a determination, according to the terms of the stipulated decision and order, that the stipulated conditions have occurred.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 9.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3051.

This chapter does not apply to any person licensed as a transporter under Article 1 (commencing with Section 11700) or as a salesperson under Article 2 (commencing with Section 11800) of Chapter 4 of Division 5, or to any licensee who is not a new motor vehicle dealer, motor vehicle manufacturer, manufacturer branch, new motor vehicle distributor, distributor branch, or representative. This chapter does not apply to transactions involving “mobilehomes,” as defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code, “recreational vehicles,” as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, truck campers, “commercial coaches,” as defined in Section 18001.8 of the Health and Safety Code, or off-highway motor vehicles subject to identification, as defined in Section 38012, except off-highway motorcycles, as defined in Section 436, and all-terrain vehicles, as defined in Section 111. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, this chapter applies to a new motor vehicle dealer, a dealer of new recreational vehicles, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, except a dealer who deals exclusively in truck campers, a vehicle manufacturer as defined in Section 672, a manufacturer branch as defined in Section 389, a distributor as defined in Section 296, a distributor branch as defined in Section 297, a representative as defined in Section 512, or an applicant therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 703, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Hearings on Franchise Modification, Replacement, Termination, Refusal to Continue, Delivery and Preparation Obligations, and Warranty Reimbursement [3060. - 3069.1.]

3060.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 20999.1 of the Business and Professions Code or the terms of any franchise, no franchisor shall terminate or refuse to continue any existing franchise unless all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The franchisee and the board have received written notice from the franchisor as follows:

(A) Sixty days before the effective date thereof setting forth the specific grounds for termination or refusal to continue.

(B) Fifteen days before the effective date thereof setting forth the specific grounds with respect to any of the following:

(i) Transfer of any ownership or interest in the franchise without the consent of the franchisor, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld.

(ii) Misrepresentation by the franchisee in applying for the franchise.

(iii) Insolvency of the franchisee, or filing of any petition by or against the franchisee under any bankruptcy or receivership law.

(iv) Any unfair business practice after written warning thereof.

(v) Failure of the motor vehicle dealer to conduct its customary sales and service operations during its customary hours of business for seven consecutive business days, giving rise to a good faith belief on the part of the franchisor that the motor vehicle dealer is in fact going out of business, except for circumstances beyond the direct control of the motor vehicle dealer or by order of the department.

(C) The written notice shall contain, on the first page thereof in at least 12-point bold type and circumscribed by a line to segregate it from the rest of the text, one of the following statements, whichever is applicable:

[To be inserted when a 60-day notice of termination is given.]

“NOTICE TO DEALER: You have the right to file a protest with the NEW MOTOR VEHICLE BOARD in Sacramento and have a hearing in which you may protest the termination of your franchise under provisions of the California Vehicle Code. You must file your protest with the board within 30 calendar days after receiving this notice or within 30 days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the franchisor or your protest right will be waived.”

[To be inserted when a 15-day notice of termination is given.]

“NOTICE TO DEALER: You have the right to file a protest with the NEW MOTOR VEHICLE BOARD in Sacramento and have a hearing in which you may protest the termination of your franchise under provisions of the California Vehicle Code. You must file your protest with the board within 10 calendar days after receiving this notice or within 10 days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the franchisor or your protest right will be waived.”

(2) Except as provided in Section 3050.7, the board finds that there is good cause for termination or refusal to continue, following a hearing called pursuant to Section 3066. The franchisee may file a protest with the board within 30 days after receiving a 60-day notice, satisfying the requirements of this section, or within 30 days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the franchisor, or within 10 days after receiving a 15-day notice, satisfying the requirements of this section, or within 10 days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the franchisor. When a protest is filed, the board shall advise the franchisor that a timely protest has been filed, that a hearing is required pursuant to Section 3066, and that the franchisor may not terminate or refuse to continue until the board makes its findings.

(3) The franchisor has received the written consent of the franchisee, or the appropriate period for filing a protest has elapsed.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 20999.1 of the Business and Professions Code or the terms of any franchise, no franchisor shall modify or replace a franchise with a succeeding franchise if the modification or replacement would substantially affect the franchisee’s sales or service obligations or investment, unless the franchisor has first given the board and each affected franchisee written notice thereof at least 60 days in advance of the modification or replacement. Within 30 days of receipt of the notice, satisfying the requirement of this section, or within 30 days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the franchisor, a franchisee may file a protest with the board and the modification or replacement does not become effective until there is a finding by the board that there is good cause for the modification or replacement. If, however, a replacement franchise is the successor franchise to an expiring or expired term franchise, the prior franchise shall continue in effect until resolution of the protest by the board. In the event of multiple protests, hearings shall be consolidated to expedite the disposition of the issue.

(2) The written notice shall contain, on the first page thereof in at least 12-point bold type and circumscribed by a line to segregate it from the rest of the text, the following statement:
